Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1099.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6143. Undetectable firearms.(a) Offense defined.--It shall be unlawful for a person to manufacture, import, sell, ship, deliver, possess, transfer or receive a firearm constructed entirely of a nonmetal substance, or a firearm that does not include at least one major component of a firearm constructed entirely of a metal substance, including a barrel, slide, cylinder, frame or receiver, which meets any of the following:(1) After removal of all parts other than major components, the firearm is not detectable as the security 1234567891011121314151617 exemplar by walk-through metal detectors that are calibrated and operated to detect the security exemplar.(2) The firearm includes a major component of which, when subject to inspection by the types of detection devices commonly used at airports for security screening, does not generate an image that accurately depicts the shape of the component.(b) Grading.--An offense under this section constitutes a felony of the third degree.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Major component." With respect to a firearm, the term shall include any of the following:(1) The barrel.(2) The slide or cylinder.(3) The frame or receiver.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1099PN1213 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718